Rhode Island, session 2025, SB654.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
PILOT PROGRAM FOR VIRTUAL REALITY LEARNING PLATFORM
16-117-1. Establishment of virtual reality learning platform pilot program.
(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2026, the general assembly shall appropriate funds for
elementary and secondary education in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000), specifically to be used to fund a pilot program to implement transformative and
innovative instructional strategies, aligned to the appropriate standards, for math and science
courses through use of virtual reality technology.
(b) The department of education shall issue a request for proposal for an experiential
learning platform that has demonstrated significant improvement in algebra 1 benchmark verified
by a third-party evaluation. The selected program shall offer tactile, multimodal learning
experiences that derive and teach standards-aligned math concepts and skills for grades six (6)
through twelve (12) STEM education. The program should immerse students in real world
problems in the economy to build career exposure and relevance, utilizing three (3) dimensional
models and interactives that visualize and manipulate abstract mathematical and scientific
concepts.

(c) The funds appropriated shall be used to train and coach middle school and high school
mathematics teachers to utilize virtual reality technology to deliver efficacious problem and
student-centered lessons in their classrooms, including the use of virtual reality headsets, in districts
selected by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education throughout the state where
there is a demonstrated need for increased student engagement and achievement in mathematics.
(d) The request for proposal process shall be completed no later than August 1, 2025. The
selected provider shall provide a third party written report to the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education prior to the start of the next full school year following the beginning of the
pilot program demonstrating the impact of the program on student engagement and achievement.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002249/SUB A
========
LC002249/SUB A - Page 2 of 3